Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 9 Blasting or Excavating Near Underground Facilities

Cross references.

Distribution, storage, and sale of gas generally, T. 46, C. 4.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Enforcement Procedures under the Georgia Utility Facility Protection Act, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapter 515-9-4.

25-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Underground Facility Protection Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

25-9-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “Underground” for “Utility”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1, effective July 1, 2000, renumbered former Code Section 25-9-1 as present Code Section 25-9-2.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004).

25-9-2.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect the public from physical harm, prevent injury to persons and property, and prevent interruptions of service resulting from damage to underground facilities and sewer laterals caused by blasting or excavating operations by providing a method whereby the location of underground facilities and sewer laterals will be made known to persons planning to engage in blasting or excavating operations so that such persons may observe proper precautions with respect to such underground facilities and sewer laterals.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-9-2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 1/SB 274; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, deleted “utility” preceding “service” and substituted “underground facilities” for “utility facilities” three times.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1, effective July 1, 2000, renumbered former Code Section 25-9-2 as present Code Section 25-9-3.

25-9-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Abandoned underground facility” means an underground facility taken out of service by a facility owner or operator on or after January 1, 2001.

“Appropriate notice” means a notice period that:

Is associated with an effective date;

Begins at 7:00 A.M. on the first business day following receipt by the UPC of a locate request submitted in compliance with Code Section 25-9-6; and

Ends at 7:00 A.M. on the business day immediately following a period of time that is not:

Less than two business days; or

More than eight business days.

“Betterments” means any upgrading of the underground facility being repaired made solely for the benefit of and at the election of the facility owner or operator and not attributable to the damage.

“Blasting” means any operation by which the level or grade of land is changed or by which earth, rock, buildings, structures, or other masses or materials are rended, torn, demolished, moved, or removed by the detonation of dynamite or any other explosive agent.

“Business days” means Monday through Friday, excluding the following holidays: New Year’s Day, Birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Memorial Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, Thanksgiving Day and the following Friday, Christmas Eve, and Christmas Day. Any such holiday that falls on a Saturday shall be observed on the preceding Friday. Any such holiday that falls on a Sunday shall be observed on the following Monday. If Christmas Eve falls on a Friday, it shall be observed on the preceding Thursday. If Christmas Eve falls on a Sunday, it shall be observed on the following Tuesday.

“Business hours” means the time from 7:00 A.M. to 4:30 P.M. local time on business days.

“Commission” means the Public Service Commission.

“Corporation” means any corporation; municipal corporation; county; authority; joint-stock company; partnership; association; business trust; cooperative; organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not; or receiver or receivers or trustee or trustees of any of the foregoing.

“Damage” means any impact or exposure that results in the need to repair an underground facility or sewer lateral due to the weakening or the partial or complete destruction of the facility or sewer lateral including, but not limited to, the protective coating, lateral support, cathodic protection, or the housing for the line, device, sewer lateral, or facility.

“Design locate request” means a communication to the UPC in which a request for locating existing underground facilities for bidding, predesign, or advance planning purposes is made.

“Designate” means to stake or mark on the surface of the tract or parcel of land the location of an underground facility or sewer lateral.

“Effective date” means the calendar day on which blasting or excavating is anticipated to begin as indicated by the excavator in the locate request.

“Emergency” means a sudden or unforeseen occurrence involving a clear and imminent danger to life, health, or property; the interruption of underground services; or repairs to transportation facilities that require immediate action.

“Emergency 9-1-1 call” means using the digits, address, internet protocol address, or other information to access or initiate contact with a public safety answering point.

“Excavating” means any operation using mechanized equipment or explosives to move earth, rock, or other material below existing grade. Such term shall include, but shall not be limited to, augering, blasting, boring, digging, ditching, dredging, drilling, driving-in, grading, plowing-in, ripping, scraping, trenching, and tunneling.

Such term shall not include:

Farming activities;

Milling or pavement repair that does not exceed the depth of the existing pavement or 12 inches, whichever is less; or

Routine road maintenance or railroad maintenance activities carried out by road maintenance or railroad employees or contractors, provided that such activities:

Occur entirely within the right of way of a public road, street, railroad, or highway of the state;

Are carried out with reasonable care so as to protect any underground facilities and sewer laterals placed in the right of way by permit; are carried out within the limits of any original excavation on the traveled way, shoulders, or drainage ditches of a public road, street, railroad, or highway, and do not exceed 18 inches in depth below the grade existing prior to such activities; and

If involving the replacement of existing guard rails and sign posts, replace such guard rails and sign posts in their previous locations and at their previous depth.

“Excavator” means any person engaged in blasting or excavating.

“Extraordinary circumstances” means circumstances other than normal operating conditions which exist making it impractical or impossible for a facility owner or operator to comply with the provisions of this chapter. Such extraordinary circumstances may include, but shall not be limited to, hurricanes, tornadoes, floods, ice and snow, and other acts of God.

“Facility owner or operator” means any person or entity with the sole exception of a homeowner that owns, operates, or controls the operation of an underground facility.

“Farming activities” means the tilling of the fields related to agricultural activities but shall not include other types of mechanized excavating on a farm.

“Horizontal directional drilling” or “HDD” means a type of trenchless excavation that uses guidable boring equipment to excavate in an essentially horizontal plane without disturbing or with minimal disturbance to the ground surface.

“Large project” means an excavation that involves more work to locate underground facilities than can reasonably be completed within the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 25-9-7.

“Local governing authority” means:

A county, municipality, or local authority created by or pursuant to a general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly, or by the Constitution of the State of Georgia; and

Any local authority that is created or activated by an appropriate ordinance or resolution of the governing body of a county or municipality individually or jointly with other political subdivisions of this state.

“Locate request” means a communication between an excavator and the UPC in which a request for designating underground facilities, sewer laterals, or both is processed.

“Locator” means a person that is acting on behalf of facility owners and operators in designating the location of the underground facilities and sewer laterals of such owners and operators.

“Mechanized excavating equipment” means all equipment powered by any motor, engine, or hydraulic or pneumatic device which is used for excavating.

“Milling” means the process of grinding asphaltic concrete.

“Minimally intrusive excavation methods” means methods of excavation that minimize the potential for damage to underground facilities and sewer laterals. Such term shall include, but shall not be limited to, air entrainment/vacuum extraction systems and water jet/vacuum excavation systems operated by qualified personnel and careful hand tool usage and other methods as determined by the commission. Such term shall not include the use of trenchless excavation.

“Notice period” means the period of time during which the designation of underground facilities or sewer laterals, or both, is supposed to occur in accordance with this chapter.

“Permanent marker” means a visible indication of the approximate location of an underground facility or sewer lateral that can reasonably be expected to remain in position for the life of the facility. Such term shall include, but shall not be limited to, sewer cleanouts; water meter boxes; and etching, cutting, or attaching medallions or other industry accepted surface markers to curbing, pavement, or other similar visible fixed surfaces.

“Person” means an individual, firm, joint venture, partnership, association, local governing authority, state, or other governmental unit, authority, department, agency, or a corporation and shall include any trustee, receiver, assignee, employee, agent, or personal representative thereof.

“Positive response information system” or “PRIS” means the automated information system operated and maintained by the UPC at its location that allows excavators, locators, facility owners or operators, and other affected parties to determine the status of a locate request or a design locate request.

“Public safety answering point” shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

“Routine road maintenance” means work that is planned and performed on a routine basis to maintain and preserve the condition of the public road system and includes routine road surface scraping, mowing grass, animal removal, cleaning of inlets and culverts, trash removal, striping and striping removal, and cutting of trees; however, stump removal shall be considered excavation.

“Sewer lateral” means an individual customer service line which transports waste water from one or more building units to an underground sewer facility.

“Sewer system owner or operator” means the owner or operator of a sewer system. Sewer systems shall be considered to extend to the connection to the customer’s facilities.

“Tolerance zone” means the width of the underground facility or sewer lateral plus 18 inches on either side of the outside edge of the underground facility or sewer lateral on a horizontal plane.

“Traffic control devices” means all electronic or electrically powered roadway signs, sign structures, or signals of a local governing authority or the Department of Transportation and all associated underground infrastructure on which the public relies for informational, regulatory, or warning messages concerning the public rights of way.

“Traffic management system” means a network of traffic control devices, monitoring sensors, and personnel of a local governing authority or the Department of Transportation, with all associated communications and power services, including all system control and management centers.

“Trenchless excavation” means a method of excavation that uses boring equipment to excavate with minimal or no disturbance to the ground surface. Such term shall include HDD.

“Underground facility” means an underground or submerged fiber, conductor, pipe, or structure used or installed for use in providing traffic control, traffic management, electric service, or communications service, or in carrying, providing, or gathering gas, oil or oil products, sewage, waste water, storm drainage, or water or other liquids. All underground facilities shall be considered to extend up to the connection to the customer’s facilities. Such term shall not include sewer laterals or publicly or privately owned railroad facilities.

“Unlocatable facility” means an underground facility that cannot be marked with reasonable accuracy using generally accepted techniques or equipment commonly used to designate underground facilities and sewer laterals. Such term shall include, but shall not be limited to, nonconductive underground facilities and sewer laterals and nonmetallic underground facilities that have no trace wires or records that indicate a specific location.

“Utilities Protection Center” or “UPC” means the corporation or other organization formed by facility owners or operators to provide a joint notification service for the purpose of receiving advance notification from persons planning to blast or excavate and distributing such notifications to its affected facility owner or operator members.

“White lining” means marking the route of the excavation either electronically or with white paint, flags, stakes, or a combination of such methods to outline the dig site prior to notifying the UPC and before the locator arrives on the job.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 226, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1659, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1577, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 515, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 177, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-9-3

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 2/SB 274; Ga. L. 2014, p. 652, § 1/SB 117; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “shall not” for “may not” in the last sentence of paragraph (8); rewrote paragraph (12); added present paragraph (16); redesignated former paragraphs (16) through (21) as present paragraphs (17) through (22), respectively; substituted “designating” for “locating” in present paragraph (20); added present paragraph (23); redesignated former paragraphs (22) through (25) as present paragraphs (24) through (27), respectively; added paragraph (28); redesignated former paragraphs (26) through (35) as present paragraphs (29) through (38), respectively; and added paragraph (39).

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, rewrote this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, paragraphs (33) and (34) were redesignated as paragraphs (34) and (35), respectively.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, paragraph (33), as enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 813, was redesignated as paragraph (34) and paragraph (34), as enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 813, was redesignated as paragraph (35).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, the definitions of “traffic management system” and “tolerance zone” were redesignated into alphabetical order.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 25-9-3, concerning the requirement that utilities with gas pipes or underground facilities file information with superior court clerks, was repealed and reserved by Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, and was based on Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 417, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act); and Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1.

25-9-4.
Design locate request and response.

Any person may submit a design locate request to the UPC. Such design locate request shall:

Describe the tract or parcel of land for which the design locate request has been submitted with sufficient particularity, as defined by policies developed and promulgated by the UPC, to enable the facility owner or operator to ascertain the precise tract or parcel of land involved; and

State the name, address, and telephone number of the person that has submitted the design locate request, as well as the name, address, and telephone number of any other person authorized to review any records subject to inspection as provided in subparagraph (b)(2)(B) of this Code section.

Within ten business days after a design locate request has been submitted to the UPC for a proposed project, the facility owner or operator shall respond to the person calling in the design locate request under the guidelines listed below:

For single address requests, designate or cause to be designated by a locator in accordance with Code Sections 25-9-7 and 25-9-9 the location of all underground facilities and sewer laterals within the area of the proposed excavation; or

For multiple address requests:

Provide the person submitting the design locate request the best available description of all underground facilities and sewer laterals in the area of proposed excavation, which might include drawings of underground facilities and sewer laterals already built in the area, or other facility records that are maintained by the facility owner or operator; or

Allow the person submitting the design locate request or any other authorized person to inspect or copy the drawings or other records for all underground facilities and sewer laterals within the proposed area of excavation.

Upon responding using any of the methods provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the facility owner or operator shall provide the response to the UPC in accordance with UPC procedures.

A design locate request shall not be used for excavation purposes.

A design locate request shall not be required as a condition for approving a utility permit application.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 3/SB 274; Ga. L. 2014, p. 652, § 2/SB 117; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “the method requested by the person calling in the design locate request” for “one of the following methods” at the end of subsection (b); substituted “Code Sections 25-9-7 and 25-9-9” for “Code Section 25-9-9” in paragraph (b)(1); and added subsection (d).

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “that” for “who” in paragraph (a)(2); in the introductory language of subsection (b), substituted “business” for “working”, substituted “respond to” for “respond by the method requested by”, and added “under the guidelines listed below” at the end; in paragraph (b)(1), substituted “For single address requests, designate” for “Designate” at the beginning and added “or” at the end; redesignated former paragraphs (b)(2) and (b)(3) as present subparagraphs (b)(2)(A) and (b)(2)(B), respectively; added “For multiple address requests:” as the introductory language of paragraph (b)(2); substituted “underground” for “utility” in paragraph (b)(1), twice in subparagraph (b)(2)(A), and in subparagraph (b)(2)(B); and added subsection (e).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, "subparagraph (b)(2)(B) of this Code section" was substituted for "paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section" near the end of paragraph (a)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1, effective July 1, 2000, renumbered former Code Section 25-9-4 as present Code Section 25-9-5, and enacted this Code section.

25-9-5.
Cooperation with UPC; permanent markers for water and sewer facilities; accurate placement; point of contact list.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this Code section, all facility owners or operators operating or maintaining underground facilities within the state shall participate as members in and cooperate with the UPC. No duplicative center shall be established. The activities of the UPC shall be funded by all facility owners or operators.

Persons that install water and sewer facilities or that own such facilities until those facilities are accepted by a local governing authority or other entity are not required to participate as members of the UPC and shall not be considered facility owners or operators. All such persons shall install and maintain permanent markers identifying all water and sewer facilities at the time of the facility installation. Notwithstanding the above, all owners or operators of water and sewer facilities that provide service from such facilities shall be considered facility owners or operators and shall be members of the UPC.

All permanent markers other than sewer cleanouts, water meter boxes, or any other visible components of an underground facility that establish the exact location of the underground facility shall be placed accurately in accordance with Code Section 25-9-9 and shall be located within the public right of way. Sewer cleanouts, water meter boxes, or any other visible components of an underground facility that establish the exact location of the underground facility shall be located within ten feet of the public right of way to be considered a permanent marker.

The UPC shall maintain a list of the name, address, and telephone number of the office, department, or other source from or through which information as to the location of underground facilities of its participating facility owners or operators may be obtained during business hours on business days.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-9-5

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 4/SB 274; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “underground” for “utility” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted “that” for “who” twice in the first sentence, deleted “, as defined in Code Section 25-9-3,” following “markers” in the second sentence, and substituted “shall be” for “are” in the third sentence; added subsection (c); redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (d); and substituted “as to the location of underground” for “respecting the location of utility” in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section

25-9-5

, concerning duties of the superior court clerks and filing fees, was repealed and reserved by Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, and was based on Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 417, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1396, § 16; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act); §

25-9-5

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1.

25-9-6.
Prerequisites to blasting or excavating; marking of sites.

No person shall commence, perform, or engage in blasting or in excavating with mechanized excavating equipment on any tract or parcel of land in any county in this state unless and until the person planning the blasting or excavating has submitted a locate request to the UPC that provides appropriate notice. Any person performing excavation is responsible for being aware of all information timely entered into the PRIS prior to the commencement of excavation. If, prior to the expiration of the appropriate notice period, all identified facility owners or operators have responded to the locate request, and if all such facility owners or operators have indicated that their facilities either are not in conflict or have been marked, then the person planning to perform blasting or excavating shall be authorized to commence work, subject to the other requirements of this Code section, without waiting until the end of the notice period. No appropriate notice shall be required for excavating where minimally intrusive excavation methods are used exclusively. Any locate request received by the UPC after business hours shall be deemed to have been received by the UPC the next business day. Such locate request shall:

Describe the tract or parcel of land upon which the blasting or excavating is to take place with sufficient particularity, as defined by policies developed and promulgated by the UPC, to enable the facility owner or operator to ascertain the precise tract or parcel of land involved;

State the name, address, and telephone number of the person that will engage in the blasting or excavating;

Describe the type of blasting or excavating to be engaged in by the person;

Specify an effective date for the requested blasting or excavating and the duration of time in which such blasting or excavating is expected to take place; and

Provide appropriate notice.

In the event the location upon which the blasting or excavating is to take place cannot be described with sufficient particularity to enable the facility owner or operator to ascertain the precise tract or parcel involved, the person proposing the blasting or excavating shall mark the route or boundary of the site of the proposed blasting or excavating by means of white lining, as practical, or schedule an on-site meeting with the locator or facility owner or operator and inform the UPC, within a reasonable time, of the results of such meeting. The person marking a site using white lining shall comply with the rules and regulations of the Department of Transportation as to the use of such markings so as not to obstruct signs, pavement markings, pavement, or other safety devices.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no blasting or excavating undertaken pursuant to a locate request shall take place more than 30 calendar days after the effective date. In the event that the blasting or excavating that is the subject of a locate request submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section will not be completed within 30 calendar days following the effective date of such locate request, an additional locate request with appropriate notice must be submitted to the UPC. Additional appropriate notices for an existing locate request shall not expand the tract or parcel of land upon which the blasting or excavation is to take place.

For emergencies, no blasting or excavating shall take place after 7:00 A.M. on the third business day after the locate request is submitted to the UPC.

Except for those persons submitting design locate requests, no person, including any facility owner or operator, shall request marking of a site through the UPC unless excavating is scheduled to commence. In addition, no person shall make repeated requests for re-marking, unless the repeated request is required for excavating to continue or due to circumstances not reasonably within the control of such person. Any person that willfully fails to comply with this subsection shall be liable to the facility owner or operator for $100.00 or for actual costs, whichever is greater, for each repeated request for re-marking.

If, subsequent to submitting a locate request to the UPC required by subsection (a) of this Code section, a person planning excavating determines that such work will require blasting, then such person shall promptly so notify the UPC and shall refrain from any blasting until the facility owner or operator responds within 48 hours, excluding hours during days other than business days, following receipt by the UPC of such notification.

When a locate request is made in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section, excavators other than the person planning the blasting or excavating may conduct such activity, provided that the person planning the blasting or excavating shall remain responsible for ensuring that any stakes or other markings placed in accordance with this chapter remain in place and reasonably visible until such blasting or excavating is completed; and provided, further, that such blasting or excavating is:

Performed on the tract or parcel of land identified in the locate request;

Performed by a person authorized by and having a contractual relationship with the person planning the blasting or excavating;

The type of blasting or excavating described in the locate request; and

Carried out in accordance with all other requirements of this chapter.

Facility owners or operators may bill an excavator for their costs related to any requests for re-marking other than for re-marks with no more than five individual addresses on a single locate request. Such costs shall be documented actual costs and shall not exceed $100.00 per re-mark request.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 417, § 3; Code 1981, §

25-9-5

[repealed]; Code 1981, §

25-9-6

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 5/SB 274; Ga. L. 2014, p. 652, § 3/SB 117; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90; Ga. L. 2016, p. 239, § 1/SB 191; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(4) for the former provisions, which read: “Designate the date upon which the blasting or excavating will commence”; and added the last sentence in subsections (b) and (c).

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “facilities either are” for “facilities are either” in the third sentence of the introductory language of subsection (a); and substituted “so as not to obstruct signs” for “so as to not to obstruct signs” in the last sentence of subsection (b).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “30 calendar days” for “21 calendar days” twice in subsection (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, rewrote subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted “lining, as” for “paint, white stakes, or white flags if” in the first sentence and “using” for “with” in the second sentence; rewrote subsections (c) and (d); in subsection (e), substituted “any facility owner or operator” for “facility owners or operators” in the first sentence and “that” for “who” in the third sentence; in subsection (f), substituted “submitting a locate request” for “giving the notice”, substituted “48 hours” for “24 hours”, and substituted “notification” for “notice” at the end; and substituted “for their costs related to” for “their costs for” in the first sentence of subsection (h).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly provided for a gas company’s duties upon being notified of proposed blasting or excavating. Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered the former Code section as Code Section 25-9-7.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered former Code Section 25-9-5 as this Code section.